Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.040

Notice of approval or denial by director.

(1) The director must, within sixty days after receiving a complete written application under RCW 30B.38.030, including any waiver request, notify the home state regulator and the out-of-state trust institution of the director's approval or denial of the written application or waiver request, including any other conditions for approval that the director may require.

(2) The sixty-day period of review may be extended by the director on a determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the out-of-state trust institution may engage in trust business in Washington state only on prior written approval by the director.

[ 2019 c 389 s 50; 2014 c 37 s 370.]